Nebraska, session 109, LB958A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB958A LB958A
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $-0- from the General
Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $-0- from the General Fund for FY2027-28 to
the Department of Health and Human Services, for Program 33, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 958, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per
diems from funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $-0- for
FY2026-27 or $-0- for FY2027-28.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated (1) $-0- from the General Fund
for FY2026-27 and (2) $-0- from the General Fund for FY2027-28 to the
Department of Health and Human Services, for Program 348, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 958, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$-0- General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2027-28 $-0- General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this
section.
-2-